Utah statutes.
10-6-113.   Budget -- Notice of hearing to consider adoption.

At the meeting at which each tentative budget is adopted, the governing body shall establish the time and place of a public hearing to consider its adoption and shall order that notice of the public hearing be published at least seven days prior to the hearing:

(1) (a)  in at least one issue of a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the city is located; or

(b)  if there is not a newspaper as described in Subsection (1)(a), then the notice required by this section may be posted in three public places within the city; and

(2) on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701.



Amended by Chapter 90, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 116, 2010 General Session

